Washington statutes.
RCW 36.88.062

Formation of district—Committee or hearing officer may conduct hearings—Report to legislative authority.

In lieu of the county legislative authority holding the hearing under RCW 36.88.060 to create the road improvement district, the county legislative authority may adopt an ordinance providing for a committee of the county legislative authority or an officer to conduct the hearings. The committee or hearing officer shall report recommendations on the resolution to the full county legislative authority for final action, which need not hold a hearing on the proposed assessment role and shall either adopt or reject the recommendations.

[ 1994 c 71 s 3.]